Mississippi, session 2026, SB2902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-103.  (1)  The following words and phrases as used in Articles 1 and 3, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings: (a)  "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the annuity savings account, together with regular interest as provided in Section 25-11-123. (b)  "Actuarial cost" means the amount of funds presently required to provide future benefits as determined by the board based on applicable tables and formulas provided by the actuary. (c)  "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value to the accumulated contributions, annuity or benefit, as the case may be, when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest. (d)  "Actuarial tables" mean such tables of mortality and rates of interest as adopted by the board in accordance with the recommendation of the actuary. (e)  "Agency" means any governmental body employing persons in the state service. (f)  "Average compensation" means, for persons who became members of the system before March 1, 2026, the average of the four (4) highest years of earned compensation reported for an employee in a fiscal or calendar year period, or combination thereof that do not overlap, or the last forty-eight (48) consecutive months of earned compensation reported for an employee.  The four (4) years need not be successive or joined years of service.  "Average compensation" means, for persons who became members of the system on or after March 1, 2026, the average of the * * * eight (8) six (6) highest consecutive years of earned compensation reported for an employee in a fiscal or calendar year period, or of the last * * * ninety‑six (96) seventy-two (72) consecutive months of earned compensation reported for an employee, whichever is greater. In computing the average compensation for retirement, disability or survivor benefits, any amount lawfully paid in a lump sum for personal leave or major medical leave shall be included in the calculation to the extent that the amount does not exceed an amount that is equal to thirty (30) days of earned compensation and to the extent that it does not cause the employee's earned compensation to exceed the maximum reportable amount specified in paragraph (k) of this subsection; however, this thirty-day limitation shall not prevent the inclusion in the calculation of leave earned under federal regulations before July 1, 1976, and frozen as of that date as referred to in Section 25-3-99.  In computing the average compensation, no amounts shall be used that are in excess of the amount on which contributions were required and paid, and no nontaxable amounts paid by the employer for health or life insurance premiums for the employee shall be used.  If any member who is or has been granted any increase in annual salary or compensation of more than eight percent (8%) retires within twenty-four (24) months from the date that the increase becomes effective, then the board shall exclude that part of the increase in salary or compensation that exceeds eight percent (8%) in calculating that member's average compensation for retirement purposes.  The board may enforce this provision by rule or regulation. However, increases in compensation in excess of eight percent (8%) per year granted within twenty-four (24) months of the date of retirement may be included in the calculation of average compensation if satisfactory proof is presented to the board showing that the increase in compensation was the result of an actual change in the position held or services rendered, or that the compensation increase was authorized by the State Personnel Board or was increased as a result of statutory enactment, and the employer furnishes an affidavit stating that the increase granted within the last twenty-four (24) months was not contingent on a promise or agreement of the employee to retire. Nothing in Section 25-3-31 shall affect the calculation of the average compensation of any member for the purposes of this article.  The average compensation of any member who retires before July 1, 1992, shall not exceed the annual salary of the Governor. (g) "Beneficiary" means any person entitled to receive a retirement allowance, an annuity or other benefit as provided by Articles 1 and 3.  The term "beneficiary" may also include an organization, estate, trust or entity; however, a beneficiary designated or entitled to receive monthly payments under an optional settlement based on life contingency or under a statutory monthly benefit may only be a natural person.  In the event of the death before retirement of any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance on the basis that the member has less than four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance on the basis that the member has less than eight (8) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance on the basis that the member has less than six (6) years of membership service credit, and/or has not been married for a minimum of one (1) year or the spouse has waived his or her entitlement to a retirement allowance under Section 25-11-114, the lawful spouse of a member at the time of the death of the member shall be the beneficiary of the member unless the member has designated another beneficiary after the date of marriage in writing, and filed that writing in the office of the executive director of the board of trustees. No designation or change of beneficiary shall be made in any other manner. (h)  "Board" means the board of trustees provided in Section 25-11-15 to administer the retirement system created under this article. (i)  "Creditable service" means "prior service," "retroactive service" and all lawfully credited unused leave not exceeding the accrual rates and limitations provided in Section 25-3-91 et seq., as of the date of withdrawal from service plus "membership service" and other service for which credit is allowable as provided in Section 25-11-109.  Except to limit creditable service reported to the system for the purpose of computing an employee's retirement allowance or annuity or benefits provided in this article, nothing in this paragraph shall limit or otherwise restrict the power of the governing authority of a municipality or other political subdivision of the state to adopt such vacation and sick leave policies as it deems necessary. (j)  "Child" means either a natural child of the member, a child that has been made a child of the member by applicable court action before the death of the member, or a child under the permanent care of the member at the time of the latter's death, which permanent care status shall be determined by evidence satisfactory to the board.  For purposes of this paragraph, a natural child of the member is a child of the member that is conceived before the death of the member. (k)  "Earned compensation" means the full amount earned during a fiscal year by an employee not to exceed the employee compensation limit set pursuant to Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code for the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins and proportionately for less than one (1) year of service. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the value of maintenance furnished to an employee shall not be included in earned compensation.  Earned compensation shall not include any amounts paid by the employer for health or life insurance premiums for an employee.  Earned compensation shall be limited to the regular periodic compensation paid, exclusive of litigation fees, bond fees, performance-based incentive payments, and other similar extraordinary nonrecurring payments.  In addition, any member in a covered position, as defined by Public Employees' Retirement System laws and regulations, who is also employed by another covered agency or political subdivision shall have the earnings of that additional employment reported to the Public Employees' Retirement System regardless of whether the additional employment is sufficient in itself to be a covered position.  In addition, computation of earned compensation shall be governed by the following: (i)  In the case of constables, the net earnings from their office after deduction of expenses shall apply, except that in no case shall earned compensation be less than the total direct payments made by the state or governmental subdivisions to the official. (ii)  In the case of chancery or circuit clerks, the net earnings from their office after deduction of expenses shall apply as expressed in Section 25-11-123(f)(4). (iii)  In the case of members of the State Legislature, all remuneration or amounts paid, except mileage allowance, shall apply. (iv)  The amount by which an eligible employee's salary is reduced under a salary reduction agreement authorized under Section 25-17-5 shall be included as earned compensation under this paragraph, provided this inclusion does not conflict with federal law, including federal regulations and federal administrative interpretations under the federal law, pertaining to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act or to Internal Revenue Code Section 125 cafeteria plans. (v)  Compensation in addition to an employee's base salary that is paid to the employee under the vacation and sick leave policies of a municipality or other political subdivision of the state that employs him or her that exceeds the maximums authorized by Section 25-3-91 et seq. shall be excluded from the calculation of earned compensation under this article. (vi)  The maximum salary applicable for retirement purposes before July 1, 1992, shall be the salary of the Governor. (vii)  Nothing in Section 25-3-31 shall affect the determination of the earned compensation of any member for the purposes of this article. (viii)  The value of maintenance furnished to an employee before July 1, 2013, for which the proper amount of employer and employee contributions have been paid, shall be included in earned compensation.  From and after July 1, 2013, the value of maintenance furnished to an employee shall be reported as earned compensation only if the proper amount of employer and employee contributions have been paid on the maintenance and the employee was receiving maintenance and having maintenance reported to the system as of June 30, 2013.  The value of maintenance when not paid in money shall be fixed by the employing state agency, and, in case of doubt, by the board of trustees as defined in Section 25-11-15. (ix)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the value of any in-kind benefits provided by the employer shall not be included in earned compensation.  As used in this subparagraph, "in-kind benefits" shall include, but not be limited to, group life insurance premiums, health or dental insurance premiums, nonpaid major medical and personal leave, employer contributions for social security and retirement, tuition reimbursement or educational funding, day care or transportation benefits. (l)  "Employee" means any person legally occupying a position in the state service, and shall include the employees of the retirement system created under this article. (m) "Employer" means the State of Mississippi or any of its departments, agencies or subdivisions from which any employee receives his or her compensation. (n)  "Executive director" means the secretary to the board of trustees, as provided in Section 25-11-15(9), and the administrator of the Public Employees' Retirement System and all systems under the management of the board of trustees.  Wherever the term "Executive Secretary of the Public Employees' Retirement System" or "executive secretary" appears in this article or in any other provision of law, it shall be construed to mean the Executive Director of the Public Employees' Retirement System. (o)  "Fiscal year" means the period beginning on July 1 of any year and ending on June 30 of the next succeeding year. (p)  "Medical board" means the board of physicians or any governmental or nongovernmental disability determination service designated by the board of trustees that is qualified to make disability determinations as provided for in Section 25-11-119. (q)  "Member" means any person included in the membership of the system as provided in Section 25-11-105.  For purposes of Sections 25-11-103, 25-11-105, 25-11-109, 25-11-111, 25-11-113, 25-11-114, 25-11-115 and 25-11-117, if a member of the system withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account before July 1, 2007, and the person reenters state service and becomes a member of the system again on or after July 1, 2007, and repays all or part of the amount received as a refund and interest in order to receive creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2007, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, subject to the eight-year membership service requirement, as applicable in those sections.  For purposes of Sections 25-11-103, 25-11-111, 25-11-114 and 25-11-115, if a member of the system withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account before July 1, 2011, and the person reenters state service and becomes a member of the system again on or after July 1, 2011, and repays all or part of the amount received as a refund and interest in order to receive creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2011, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011.  If a member of the system withdrew from state service and received a refund of the amount of the accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account before March 1, 2026, and the person reenters state service and becomes a member of the system again on or after March 1, 2026, the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and may not receive creditable service for service rendered before March 1, 2026; however, if such person completes six (6) years of service as a first responder, beginning on or after March 1, 2026, he or she may repay all or part of the amount received as a refund and interest in order to receive up to five (5) years of creditable service for service rendered before March 1, 2026, as provided in Section 25-11-117(3)(c)(ii), and the member shall be considered to have become a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026. (r)  "Membership service" means service as an employee in a covered position rendered while a contributing member of the retirement system. (s) "Position" means any office or any employment in the state service, or two (2) or more of them, the duties of which call for services to be rendered by one (1) person, including positions jointly employed by federal and state agencies administering federal and state funds.  The employer shall determine upon initial employment and during the course of employment of an employee who does not meet the criteria for coverage in the Public Employees' Retirement System based on the position held, whether the employee is or becomes eligible for coverage in the Public Employees' Retirement System based upon any other employment in a covered agency or political subdivision.  If or when the employee meets the eligibility criteria for coverage in the other position, then the employer must withhold contributions and report wages from the noncovered position in accordance with the provisions for reporting of earned compensation.  Failure to deduct and report those contributions shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability thereof. The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to implement and enforce this provision. (t)  "Prior service" means: (i)  For persons who became members of the system before July 1, 2007, service rendered before February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Sections 25-11-105 and 25-11-109, and which shall allow prior service for any person who is now or becomes a member of the Public Employees' Retirement System and who does contribute to the system for a minimum period of four (4) years. (ii)  For persons who became members of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, service rendered before February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Sections 25-11-105 and 25-11-109, and which shall allow prior service for any person who is now or becomes a member of the Public Employees' Retirement System and who does contribute to the system for a minimum period of eight (8) years. (iii)  For persons who became members of the system on or after March 1, 2026, service rendered before February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Sections 25-11-105 and 25-11-109, and which shall allow prior service for any person who is now or becomes a member of the Public Employees' Retirement System and who does contribute to the system for a minimum period of six (6) years. (u)  "Regular interest" means interest compounded annually at such a rate as determined by the board in accordance with Section 25-11-121. (v)  "Retirement allowance" means an annuity for life as provided in this article, payable each year in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning as of the date fixed by the board.  The retirement allowance shall be calculated in accordance with Section 25-11-111.  However, any spouse who received a spouse retirement benefit in accordance with Section 25-11-111(d) before March 31, 1971, and those benefits were terminated because of eligibility for a social security benefit, may again receive his or her spouse retirement benefit from and after making application with the board of trustees to reinstate the spouse retirement benefit. (w)  "Retroactive service" means service rendered after February 1, 1953, for which credit is allowable under Section 25-11-105(b) and Section 25-11-105(k). (x)  "System" means the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi established and described in Section 25-11-101. (y)  "State" means the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof or instrumentality of the state. (z)  "State service" means all offices and positions of trust or employment in the employ of the state, or any political subdivision or instrumentality of the state, that elect to participate as provided by Section 25-11-105(f), including the position of elected or fee officials of the counties and their deputies and employees performing public services or any department, independent agency, board or commission thereof, and also includes all offices and positions of trust or employment in the employ of joint state and federal agencies administering state and federal funds and service rendered by employees of the public schools.  Effective July 1, 1973, all nonprofessional public school employees, such as bus drivers, janitors, maids, maintenance workers and cafeteria employees, shall have the option to become members in accordance with Section 25-11-105(b), and shall be eligible to receive credit for services before July 1, 1973, provided that the contributions and interest are paid by the employee in accordance with that section; in addition, the county or municipal separate school district may pay the employer contribution and pro rata share of interest of the retroactive service from available funds. "State service" shall not include the President of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation and personnel employed by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation.  From and after July 1, 1998, retroactive service credit shall be purchased at the actuarial cost in accordance with Section 25-11-105(b). (aa)  "Withdrawal from service" or "termination from service" means complete severance of employment in the state service of any member by resignation, dismissal or discharge. (bb)  "First responder" means a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical services provider, emergency management personnel, or public safety telecommunicator. (cc)  "Law enforcement officer" means any of the following persons who are authorized to carry a firearm while in the performance of their official duties and who have met the minimum educational and training standards established by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training for permanent, full-time law enforcement officers and have received a certificate from that board: (i)  Municipal police officers and narcotics agents, but not officers who are engaged only in administrative or civil duties; (ii)  Sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, but not deputy sheriffs who are engaged only in administrative or civil duties; (iii) Constables; (iv) Conservation officers of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks; (v)  Enforcement officers of the Department of Marine Resources; (vi)  Agents and inspectors of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue; (vii) Commercial transportation inspection station employees, enforcement officers, field inspectors, railroad inspectors and other inspectors of the Department of Public Safety; (viii)  Capitol Police officers of the Department of Public Safety; (ix)  State correctional facility guards and enforcement officers of the Department of Corrections; (x)  Municipal or county jail officers, guards and enforcement officers; and (xi)  Any other full-time officer or employee of the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state, not listed in subparagraphs (i) through (x) of this paragraph, who is authorized to carry a firearm while in the performance of his or her official duties and who has met the minimum educational and training standards established by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training for permanent, full-time law enforcement officers and has received a certificate from that board.  However, the term "law enforcement officer" does not include any person who is an active member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System. (dd)  "Firefighter" means a person who is trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergencies, who is assigned to firefighting activity and is required to respond to alarms and perform emergency actions at the location of a fire, hazardous materials or other emergency incident, who is employed full time by the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state, and who has met the minimum educational and training standards established by the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board for permanent, full-time firefighters and has received a certificate from that board. (ee) "Emergency medical services provider" means a person who is certified by the State Department of Health as one of the types of emergency medical services personnel under Section 41-59-1 et seq., and who is employed full time by the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state.  This term also includes 911 dispatchers who are employed full time by the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state. (ff) "Emergency management personnel" means any full-time employee of the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision of the state, whose primary duties involve planning for, coordinating, or supporting emergency management functions under the Mississippi Emergency Management Law, Section 33-15-1 et seq., including preparedness response, recovery, mitigation, and emergency operations center activities. (gg)  "Public safety telecommunicator" means any full-time employee of the state, or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, who is engaged in receiving, processing, or dispatching requests for emergency services for a public safety, fire, or emergency medical agency, and who provides or relays emergency-related information by telephone, radio, or other communication systems. ( * * *bbhh)  The masculine pronoun, wherever used, includes the feminine pronoun. (2)  For purposes of this article, the term "political subdivision" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 25-11-5 and shall also include public charter schools. SECTION 2.  Section 25-11-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-105.  I.  THOSE WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP The membership of this retirement system shall be composed as follows: (a)  (i)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and whose wages are subject to payroll taxes and are lawfully reported on IRS Form W-2, except those specifically excluded, or as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, shall become members of the retirement system as a condition of their employment. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2002, any individual who is employed by a governmental entity to perform professional services shall become a member of the system if the individual is paid regular periodic compensation for those services that is subject to payroll taxes, is provided all other employee benefits and meets the membership criteria established by the regulations adopted by the board of trustees that apply to all other members of the system; however, any active member employed in such a position on July 1, 2002, will continue to be an active member for as long as they are employed in any such position. (b)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, except those specifically excluded or as to whom election is provided in Articles 1 and 3, unless they file with the board before the lapse of sixty (60) days of employment or sixty (60) days after the effective date of the cited articles, whichever is later, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of election not to be covered by the membership of the retirement system and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits that would otherwise inure to them on account of their participation in the system, shall become members of the retirement system; however, no credit for prior service will be granted to members who became members of the system before July 1, 2007, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least four (4) years, or to members who became members of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least eight (8) years, or to members who became members of the system on or after March 1, 2026, until they have contributed to Article 3 of the retirement system for a minimum period of at least six (6) years.  Those members shall receive credit for services performed before January 1, 1953, in employment now covered by Article 3, but no credit shall be granted for retroactive services between January 1, 1953, and the date of their entry into the retirement system, unless the employee pays into the retirement system both the employer's and the employee's contributions on wages paid him during the period from January 31, 1953, to the date of his becoming a contributing member, together with interest at the rate determined by the board of trustees.  Members reentering after withdrawal from service shall qualify for prior service under the provisions of Section 25-11-117.  From and after July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, the member may receive credit for such retroactive service provided: (i)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of that service from the covered employer where the services were performed; and (ii)  The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service.  The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415. Nothing contained in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of the employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest. (c)  All persons who become employees in the state service after January 31, 1953, and who are eligible for membership in any other retirement system shall become members of this retirement system as a condition of their employment, unless they elect at the time of their employment to become a member of that other system. (d)  All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who are members of any nonfunded retirement system operated by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall become members of this system with prior service credit unless, before February 1, 1953, they file a written notice with the board of trustees that they do not elect to become members. (e)  All persons who are employees in the state service on January 31, 1953, and who under existing laws are members of any fund operated for the retirement of employees by the State of Mississippi, or any of its departments or agencies, shall not be entitled to membership in this retirement system unless, before February 1, 1953, any such person indicates by a notice filed with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, his individual election and choice to participate in this system, but no such person shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member on or before February 1, 1953. (f)  Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision, or both, is authorized to submit, for approval by the board of trustees, a plan for extending the benefits of this article to employees of any such political subdivision or instrumentality.  Each such plan or any amendment to the plan for extending benefits thereof shall be approved by the board of trustees if it finds that the plan, or the plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in Articles 1 and 3; however, upon approval of the plan or any such plan previously approved by the board of trustees, the approved plan shall not be subject to cancellation or termination by the political subdivision or instrumentality.  No such plan shall be approved unless: (i)  It provides that all services that constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision or instrumentality, by any employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan, with the exception of municipal employees who are already covered by existing retirement plans; however, those employees in this class may elect to come under the provisions of this article; (ii)  It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (d) of Section 25-11-123 and of paragraph (f)(v)2 and 3 of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that those sources will be adequate for that purpose; (iii)  It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision or instrumentality as are found by the board of trustees to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration thereof; (iv)  It provides that the political subdivision or instrumentality will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the board of trustees may from time to time require; (v)  It authorizes the board of trustees to terminate the plan in its entirety in the discretion of the board if it finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in the plan, the termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the board and as may be consistent with applicable federal law. 1.  The board of trustees shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted under paragraph (f), and shall not terminate an approved plan without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to each political subdivision or instrumentality affected by the board's decision.  The board's decision in any such case shall be final, conclusive and binding unless an appeal is taken by the political subdivision or instrumentality aggrieved by the decision to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the provisions of law with respect to civil causes by certiorari. 2.  Each political subdivision or instrumentality as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution fund, with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5), at such time or times as the board of trustees may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the board. 3.  Every political subdivision or instrumentality required to make payments under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section is authorized, in consideration of the employees' retention in or entry upon employment after enactment of Articles 1 and 3, to impose upon its employees, as to services that are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5) not exceeding the amount provided in Section 25-11-123(d) if those services constituted employment within the meaning of Articles 1 and 3, and to deduct the amount of the contribution from the wages as and when paid.  Contributions so collected shall be paid into the contribution fund as partial discharge of the liability of the political subdivisions or instrumentalities under paragraph (f)(v)2 of this section.  Failure to deduct the contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability for the contribution. 4.  Any state agency, school, political subdivision, instrumentality or any employer that is required to submit contribution payments or wage reports under any section of this chapter shall be assessed interest on delinquent payments or wage reports as determined by the board of trustees in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board and delinquent payments, assessed interest and any other amount certified by the board as owed by an employer, may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the reporting agency liable therefor or may, upon due certification of delinquency and at the request of the board of trustees, be deducted from any other monies payable to the reporting agency by any department or agency of the state. 5.  Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision or subdivisions that submit a plan for approval of the board, as provided in this section, shall reimburse the board for coverage into the expense account, its pro rata share of the total expense of administering Articles 1 and 3 as provided by regulations of the board. (g)  The board may, in its discretion, deny the right of membership in this system to any class of employees whose compensation is only partly paid by the state or who are occupying positions on a part-time or intermittent basis.  The board may, in its discretion, make optional with employees in any such classes their individual entrance into this system. (h)  An employee whose membership in this system is contingent on his own election, and who elects not to become a member, may thereafter apply for and be admitted to membership; but no such employee shall receive prior service credit unless he becomes a member before July 1, 1953, except as provided in paragraph (b). (i)  If any member of this system changes his employment to any agency of the state having an actuarially funded retirement system, the board of trustees may authorize the transfer of the member's creditable service and of the present value of the member's employer's accumulation account and of the present value of the member's accumulated membership contributions to that other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions and provided that the other system is authorized to receive and agrees to make the transfer. If any member of any other actuarially funded system maintained by an agency of the state changes his employment to an agency covered by this system, the board of trustees may authorize the receipt of the transfer of the member's creditable service and of the present value of the member's employer's accumulation account and of the present value of the member's accumulated membership contributions from the other system, provided that the employee agrees to the transfer of his accumulated membership contributions to this system and provided that the other system is authorized and agrees to make the transfer. (j)  Wherever state employment is referred to in this section, it includes joint employment by state and federal agencies of all kinds. (k)  Employees of a political subdivision or instrumentality who were employed by the political subdivision or instrumentality before an agreement between the entity and the Public Employees' Retirement System to extend the benefits of this article to its employees, and which agreement provides for the establishment of retroactive service credit, and who became members of the retirement system before July 1, 2007, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for four (4) years, or who became members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for eight (8) years, or who became members of the retirement system on or after March 1, 2026, and have remained contributors to the retirement system for six (6) years, may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality, provided that the employee and/or employer, as provided under the terms of the modification of the joinder agreement in allowing that coverage, pay into the retirement system the employer's and employee's contributions on wages paid the member during the previous employment, together with interest or actuarial cost as determined by the board covering the period from the date the service was rendered until the payment for the credit for the service was made.  Those wages shall be verified by the Social Security Administration or employer payroll records.  Effective July 1, 1998, upon eligibility as noted above, a member may receive credit for that retroactive service with the political subdivision or instrumentality provided: (i)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of those services from the political subdivision or instrumentality where the services were rendered or verification by the Social Security Administration; and (ii)  The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for that credit or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost for each year of that creditable service.  The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under Section 415. Nothing contained in this paragraph (k) shall be construed to limit the authority of the board to allow the correction of reporting errors or omissions based on the payment of employee and employer contributions plus applicable interest.  Payment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service.  Upon the payment of all or part of the required contributions, plus interest or the actuarial cost as provided above, the member shall receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full payment has been made to the retirement system. (l)  Through June 30, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported, and requiring the payment of employee and employer contributions plus interest, or, from and after July 1, 1998, any state service eligible for retroactive service credit, no part of which has ever been reported to the retirement system, and requiring the payment of the actuarial cost for that creditable service, may, at the member's option, be purchased in quarterly increments as provided above at the time that its purchase is otherwise allowed. (m)  All rights to purchase retroactive service credit or repay a refund as provided in Section 25-11-101 et seq. shall terminate upon retirement. II. THOSE WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP The following classes of employees and officers shall not become members of this retirement system, any other provisions of Articles 1 and 3 to the contrary notwithstanding: (a)  Patient or inmate help in state charitable, penal or correctional institutions; (b)  Students of any state educational institution employed by any agency of the state for temporary, part-time or intermittent work; (c)  Participants of Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973 (CETA) being Public Law 93-203, who enroll on or after July l, 1979; (d)  From and after July 1, 2002, individuals who are employed by a governmental entity to perform professional service on less than a full-time basis who do not meet the criteria established in I(a)(ii) of this section. III. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP Membership in this system shall cease by a member withdrawing his accumulated contributions, or by a member withdrawing from active service with a retirement allowance, or by a member's death. SECTION 3.  Section 25-11-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-109.  (1)  Under such rules and regulations as the board of trustees shall adopt, each person who becomes a member of this retirement system, as provided in Section 25-11-105, on or  before July 1, 1953, or who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and contributes to the system for a minimum period of four (4) years, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and contributes to the system for a minimum period of eight (8) years, or who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and contributes to the system for a minimum period of six (6) years, shall receive credit for all state service rendered before February 1, 1953.  To receive that credit, the member shall file a detailed statement of all services as an employee rendered by him in the state service before February 1, 1953. For any member who joined the system after July 1, 1953, and before July 1, 2007, any creditable service for which the member is not required to make contributions shall not be credited to the member until the member has contributed to the system for a minimum period of at least four (4) years.  For any member who joined the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, any creditable service for which the member is not required to make contributions shall not be credited to the member until the member has contributed to the system for a minimum period of at least eight (8) years.  For any member who joined the system on or after March 1, 2026, any creditable service for which the member is not required to make contributions shall not be credited to the member until the member has contributed to the system for a minimum period of at least six (6) years. (2)  (a)  (i)  In the computation of creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2017, under the provisions of this article, the total months of accumulative service during any fiscal year shall be calculated in accordance with the schedule as follows:  ten (10) or more months of creditable service during any fiscal year shall constitute a year of creditable service; seven (7) months to nine (9) months inclusive, three-quarters (3/4) of a year of creditable service; four (4) months to six (6) months inclusive, one-half (1/2) year of creditable service; one (1) month to three (3) months inclusive, one-quarter (1/4) of a year of creditable service. (ii)  In the computation of creditable service rendered on or after July 1, 2017, under the provisions of this article, service credit shall be awarded in monthly increments in a manner prescribed by regulations of the board. (b)  In no case shall credit be allowed for any period of absence without compensation except for disability while in receipt of a disability retirement allowance, nor shall less than fifteen (15) days of service in any month, or service less than the equivalent of one-half (1/2) of the normal working load for the position and less than one-half (1/2) of the normal compensation for the position in any month, constitute a month of creditable service, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be creditable for all services rendered in any one (1) fiscal year; however, for a school employee, substantial completion of the legal school term when and where the service was rendered shall constitute a year of service credit.  Any state or local elected official shall be deemed a full-time employee for the purpose of creditable service.  However, an appointed or elected official compensated on a per diem basis only shall not be allowed creditable service for terms of office. (c)  In the computation of any retirement allowance or any annuity or benefits provided in this article, any fractional period of service of less than one (1) year shall be taken into account and a proportionate amount of such retirement allowance, annuity or benefit shall be granted for any such fractional period of service. (d)  (i)  In the computation of unused leave for creditable service authorized in Section 25-11-103, the following shall govern for members who retire before July 1, 2017:  twenty-one (21) days of unused leave shall constitute one (1) month of creditable service and in no case shall credit be allowed for any period of unused leave of less than fifteen (15) days.  The number of months of unused leave shall determine the number of quarters or years of creditable service in accordance with the above schedule for membership and prior service. (ii)  In the computation of unused leave for creditable service authorized in Section 25-11-103, the following shall govern for members who retire on or after July 1, 2017: creditable service for unused leave shall be calculated in monthly increments in which one (1) month of service credit shall be awarded for each twenty-one (21) days of unused leave, except that the first fifteen (15) to fifty-seven (57) days of leave shall constitute three (3) months of service for those who became a member of the system before July 1, 2017. (iii)  In order for the member to receive creditable service for the number of days of unused leave under this paragraph, the system must receive certification from the governing authority. (iv)  For anyone who becomes a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, no service credit shall be awarded for  unused leave. (e)  For the purposes of this subsection, members of the system who retire on or after July 1, 2010, shall receive credit for one-half (1/2) day of leave for each full year of membership service accrued after June 30, 2010.  The amount of leave received by a member under this paragraph shall be added to the lawfully credited unused leave for which creditable service is provided under Section 25-11-103(i). (f)  For the purpose of this subsection, for members of the system who are elected officers and who retire on or after July 1, 1987, the following shall govern: (i)  For service before July 1, 1984, the members shall receive credit for leave (combined personal and major medical) for service as an elected official before that date at the rate of thirty (30) days per year. (ii)  For service on and after July 1, 1984, the member shall receive credit for personal and major medical leave beginning July 1, 1984, at the rates authorized in Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95, computed as a full-time employee. (iii)  If a member is employed in a covered nonelected position and a covered elected position simultaneously, that member may not receive service credit for accumulated unused leave for both positions at retirement for the period during which the member was dually employed.  During the period during which the member is dually employed, the member shall only receive credit for leave as provided for in this paragraph for an elected official. (iv)  For any elected official who becomes a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, no service credit shall be awarded for leave. (3)  Subject to the above restrictions and to such other rules and regulations as the board may adopt, the board shall verify, as soon as practicable after the filing of such statements of service, the services therein claimed. (4)  Upon verification of the statement of prior service, the board shall issue a prior service certificate certifying to each member the length of prior service for which credit shall have been allowed on the basis of his statement of service.  So long as membership continues, a prior service certificate shall be final and conclusive for retirement purposes as to such service, provided that any member may within five (5) years from the date of issuance or modification of such certificate request the board of trustees to modify or correct his prior service certificate.  Any modification or correction authorized shall only apply prospectively. When membership ceases, such prior service certificates shall become void.  Should the employee again become a member, he shall enter the system as an employee not entitled to prior service credit except as provided in Sections 25-11-105(I), 25-11-113 and 25-11-117. (5)  Creditable service at retirement, on which the retirement allowance of a member shall be based, shall consist of the membership service rendered by him since he last became a member, and also, if he has a prior service certificate that is in full force and effect, the amount of the service certified on his prior service certificate. (6)  Any member who served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, who served in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health Service before 1972 or who served in maritime service during periods of hostility in World War II, shall be entitled to creditable service at no cost for his service on active duty in the Armed Forces, in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health Service before 1972 or in such maritime service, provided he entered state service after his discharge from the Armed Forces or entered state service after he completed such maritime service.  The maximum period for such creditable service for all military service as defined in this subsection (6) shall not exceed four (4) years unless positive proof can be furnished by such person that he was retained in the Armed Forces during World War II or in maritime service during World War II by causes beyond his control and without opportunity of discharge.  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service or maritime service records showing dates of entrance into active duty service and the date of discharge.  From and after July 1, 1993, no creditable service shall be granted for any military service or maritime service to a member who qualifies for a retirement allowance in another public retirement system administered by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System based, in whole or in part, on such military or maritime service.  In no case shall the member receive creditable service if the member received a dishonorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States. (7)  (a)  Any member of the Public Employees' Retirement System whose membership service is interrupted as a result of qualified military service within the meaning of Section 414(u)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, and who has received the maximum service credit available under subsection (6) of this section, shall receive creditable service for the period of qualified military service that does not qualify as creditable service under subsection (6) of this section upon reentering membership service in an amount not to exceed five (5) years if: (i)  The member pays the contributions he would have made to the retirement system if he had remained in membership service for the period of qualified military service based upon his salary at the time his membership service was interrupted; (ii)  The member returns to membership service within ninety (90) days of the end of his qualified military service; and (iii)  The employer at the time the member's service was interrupted and to which employment the member returns pays the contributions it would have made into the retirement system for such period based on the member's salary at the time the service was interrupted. (b)  The payments required to be made in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection may be made over a period beginning with the date of return to membership service and not exceeding three (3) times the member's qualified military service; however, in no event shall such period exceed five (5) years. (c)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service showing dates of entrance into qualified service and the date of discharge as well as proof that the member has returned to active employment within the time specified. (8)  Any member of the Public Employees' Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and who has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and who has at least six (6) years of membership service credit as a first responder, shall be entitled to receive a maximum of five (5) years' creditable service for service rendered in another state as a public employee of such other state, or a political subdivision, public education system or other governmental instrumentality thereof, or service rendered as a teacher in American overseas dependent schools conducted by the Armed Forces of the United States for children of citizens of the United States residing in areas outside the continental United States, provided that: (a)  The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of such services from the state, public education system, political subdivision or retirement system of the state where the services were performed or the governing entity of the American overseas dependent school where the services were performed; * * * and (b)  The member is not receiving or will not be entitled to receive from the public retirement system of the other state or from any other retirement plan, including optional retirement plans, sponsored by the employer, a retirement allowance including such services; * * * and (c)  The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for credit for such out-of-state service or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year of out-of-state creditable service.  The provisions of this subsection are subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under that section * * *.; and (d)  A member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and who has at least six (6) years of membership service credit as a first responder may receive no more than five (5) years of service credit in the aggregate under this subsection (8), subsections (9) and (10) of this section, and Section 25-11-117(3)(c)(ii). (9)  Any member of the Public Employees' Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and has at least six (6) years of membership service credit as a first responder, and who receives, or has received, professional leave without compensation for professional purposes directly related to the employment in state service shall receive creditable service for the period of professional leave without compensation provided: (a)  The professional leave is performed with a public institution or public agency of this state, or another state or federal agency; (b)  The employer approves the professional leave showing the reason for granting the leave and makes a determination that the professional leave will benefit the employee and employer; (c)  Such professional leave shall not exceed two (2) years during any ten-year period of state service; (d)  The employee shall serve the employer on a full-time basis for a period of time equivalent to the professional leave period granted immediately following the termination of the leave period; (e)  The contributing member shall pay to the retirement system the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year of professional leave.  The provisions of this subsection are subject to the regulations of the Internal Revenue Code limitations; and (f)  A member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and who has at least six (6) years of membership service credit as a first responder may receive no more than five (5) years of service credit in the aggregate under this subsection (9), subsections (8) and (10) of this section, and Section 25-11-117(3)(c)(ii). ( * * *fg)  Such other rules and regulations consistent herewith as the board may adopt and in case of question, the board shall have final power to decide the questions. Any actively contributing member participating in the School Administrator Sabbatical Program established in Section 37-9-77 shall qualify for continued participation under this subsection (9). (10)  Any member of the Public Employees' Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has at least four (4) years of credited membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, and has at least eight (8) years of credited membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and has at least six (6) years of credited membership service, shall be entitled to receive a maximum of ten (10) years creditable service for: (a)  Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, that does not participate in the Public Employees' Retirement System; or (b)  Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, that participates in the Public Employees' Retirement System but did not elect retroactive coverage; or (c)  Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, for which coverage of the employee's position was or is excluded; provided that the member pays into the retirement system the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year, or portion thereof, of such service.  After a member has made full payment to the retirement system for all or any part of such service, the member shall receive creditable service for the period of such service for which full payment has been made to the retirement system. A member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and who has at least six (6) years of membership service credit as a first responder may receive no more than five (5) years of service credit in the aggregate under this subsection (10), subsections (8) and (9) of this section, and Section 25-11-117(3)(c)(ii). SECTION 4.  Section 25-11-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-111.  (a)  (1)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least four (4) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (2)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (3)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty-two (62) years who has completed at least * * * eight (8) six (6) years of membership service, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least * * * thirty‑five (35) thirty (30) years of creditable service, or upon withdrawal from service when the sum of the member's age and years of creditable service is at least eighty (80) years, or upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of fifty-five (55) years who has completed at least twenty (20) years of membership service as a first responder, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of membership service as a first responder, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (b)  (1)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed four (4) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (2)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (3)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty-two (62) years who has completed * * * eight (8) six (6) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty-two (62) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.  The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member's application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service. (c)  Any member in service who has qualified for retirement benefits may select any optional method of settlement of retirement benefits by notifying the Executive Director of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System in writing, on a form prescribed by the board, of the option he has selected and by naming the beneficiary of the option and furnishing necessary proof of age.  The option, once selected, may be changed at any time before actual retirement or death, but upon the death or retirement of the member, the optional settlement shall be placed in effect upon proper notification to the executive director. (d)  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of: (1)  A member's annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and (2)  An employer's annuity, which, together with the member's annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the average compensation for each year of service exceeding twenty-five (25) years of creditable service. (3)  Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who was eligible to receive a retirement allowance before July 1, 1991, and who is still receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1992, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance of the retired member equal to one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) of the average compensation for each year of state service in excess of twenty-five (25) years of membership service up to and including thirty (30) years.  The maximum increase shall be five-eighths of one percent (5/8 of 1%).  In no case shall a member who has been retired before July 1, 1987, receive less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of creditable service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof.  Persons retired on or after July 1, 1987, shall receive at least Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof reduced for the option selected. However, such Ten Dollars ($10.00) minimum per month for each year of creditable service shall not apply to a retirement allowance computed under Section 25-11-114 based on a percentage of the member's average compensation. (e)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of: (1)  A member's annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and (2)  An employer's annuity, which, together with the member's annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including thirty (30) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of average compensation for each year of service exceeding thirty (30) years of creditable service. (f)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any such member upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section.  In the case of the retirement of any member who has attained age sixty (60) but who has not completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section except that the total annual retirement allowance shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent factor for each year of creditable service below thirty (30) years or the number of years in age that the member is below age sixty-five (65), whichever is less. (g)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty-five (65) years who has completed at least * * * eight (8) six (6) years of membership service, * * * or upon withdrawal from service at the age of sixty‑two (62) who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least * * * thirty‑five (35) thirty (30) years of creditable service, or upon withdrawal from service when the sum of the member's age and years of creditable service is at least eighty (80) years, or upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of fifty-five (55) years who has completed at least twenty (20) years of membership service as a first responder, or upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of membership service as a first responder, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of a member's annuity, which annuity shall be, for first responders, equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the average compensation for each year of service, and for all other members, equal to one percent (1%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including twenty (20) years of creditable service, and one and one-quarter percent (1.25%) of the average compensation for each year of service exceeding twenty (20) years of creditable service.  In the case of the retirement of any member who has attained the age of sixty-two (62) but has not completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, other than a member who has completed at least six (6) years of membership service as a first responder, the total annual retirement allowance specified in this subsection (g) shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent factor for each year of creditable service below thirty (30) years or the number of years in age that the member is below age sixty-five (65), whichever is less. (h)  No member, except members excluded by the Age Discrimination in Employment Act Amendments of 1986 (Public Law 99-592), under either Article 1 or Article 3 in state service shall be required to retire because of age. (i)  No payment on account of any benefit granted under the provisions of this section shall become effective or begin to accrue until January 1, 1953. (j)  (1)  A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the retirement system, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the retirement system to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled.  The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi from any claim to the waived retirement benefits. (2)  Any waiver under this subsection shall apply only to the person executing the waiver.  A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement.  However, a beneficiary may, at the option of the beneficiary, execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection. (3)  The retirement system shall retain in the annuity reserve account amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection. (4)  The board of trustees may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under this subsection. SECTION 5.  Section 25-11-112, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-112.  (1)  Any member who became a member of the system before March 1, 2026, and is receiving a retirement allowance for service or disability retirement, or any beneficiary thereof, who has received a monthly benefit for at least one (1) full fiscal year, shall be eligible to receive an additional benefit, on December 1 or July 1 of the year as provided in subsection (3) of this section, equal to an amount calculated under paragraph (a) * * * or, (b) or (c) below: (a)  For any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, the sum of: (i)  An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), plus (ii)  An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance. (b)  For any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, the sum of: (i)  An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), plus (ii)  An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance. (c)  For any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, the sum of: (i)  An amount equal to a certain percent of the annual retirement allowance, as specified in the last part of this paragraph (c), multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty-two (62), plus (ii)  An additional amount equal to a certain percent of the annual retirement allowance, as specified in the last part of this paragraph (c), compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty-two (62), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance. The percentage of the annual retirement allowance that shall be used in the calculations made in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (c) shall be the average Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) for the twelve-month period ending with the preceding June, but shall not exceed one and one-half percent (1.5%).  If the CPI-W is zero or less, there will no additional benefit paid from the assets of the system.  In addition, in any year in which an independent actuary hired by the system makes a written determination that the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the system is greater than fifteen percent (15%), there will be no additional benefit paid from the assets of the system. (2)  The calculation of the beneficiary's additional benefit under subsection (1)(a) * * * or, (b) or (c) of this section shall be based on the member's age and full fiscal years in retirement as if the member had lived. (3)  (a)  The additional benefit provided for under this section shall be paid in one (1) payment in December of each year to those persons who are receiving a retirement allowance on December 1 of that year, unless an election is made under this subsection. However, if a retiree who is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon the retiree's death is receiving the additional benefit in one (1) payment and dies on or after July 1 but before December 1, the beneficiary designated on the retirement application, if any, shall receive in a single payment a fractional part of the additional benefit based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year. Likewise, if a retiree is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon his or her death in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments, any remaining payments of the additional benefit will be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated on the application, or if none, pursuant to Section 25-11-117.1(1). Any similar remaining payments of additional benefits payable under this section to a deceased beneficiary who was receiving a monthly benefit shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-117.1(2).  If the additional monthly benefit is being received in one (1) payment, the additional benefit shall also be prorated based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year when (i) the monthly benefit payable to a beneficiary terminates due to the expiration of an option, remarriage or cessation of dependent status or due to the retiree's return to covered employment, and (ii) the monthly benefit terminates on or after July 1 and before December 1.  The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary. (b)  Retired members or beneficiaries thereof who on July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter, are receiving a retirement allowance, may elect by an irrevocable agreement in writing filed in the Office of the Public Employees' Retirement System no less than thirty (30) days before July 1 of the appropriate year, to begin receiving the additional benefit provided for under this section in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter.  This irrevocable agreement shall be binding on the member and subsequent beneficiaries.  Payment of those monthly installments shall not extend beyond the month in which a retirement allowance is due and payable.  The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary. (4)  The additional payment or payments provided for under this section are for the fiscal year in which they are paid. (5)  (a)  The amount provided for under subsection (1) (a)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula: [(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance], where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55). (b)  The amount provided for under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula: [(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance], where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60). (c)  The amount provided for under subsection (1)(c)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula: [(1 + CPI-W)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance], where "CPI-W" means the average Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the twelve-month period ending with the preceding June, and n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty-two (62). (6)  Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who has previously elected to receive the additional annual payment in monthly installments may elect, upon application on a form prescribed by the board of trustees, to have that payment made in one (1) additional payment each year.  This written election must be filed in the Office of the Public Employees' Retirement System before June 1, 2000, and shall be effective for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000. (7)  In the event of death of a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments pursuant to an election made before July 1, 1999, and who would otherwise be eligible to receive the additional benefit provided for under this section in one (1) payment in December of the current fiscal year, any remaining amounts shall be paid in a lump sum to the designated beneficiary. (8)  When a member retires after July 1 and has previously received a retirement allowance for one or more full fiscal years, the retired member shall be eligible immediately for the additional benefit.  The additional benefit shall be based on the current retirement allowance and the number of full fiscal years in retirement and shall be prorated and paid in monthly installments based on the number of months a retirement allowance is paid during the fiscal year. * * * (9)  A member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, is not entitled to the additional annual benefit under this section; however, the Legislature may provide an additional benefit for a specific year. SECTION 6.  Section 25-11-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-113.  (1)  (a)  Upon the application of a member or his employer, any active member in state service who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or any active member in state service who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, who has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, or any active member in state service who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, who has at least six (6) years of membership service credit, may be retired by the board of trustees on the first of the month following the date of filing the application on a disability retirement allowance, but in no event shall the disability retirement allowance begin before termination of state service, provided that the medical board, after an evaluation of medical evidence that may or may not include an actual physical examination by the medical board, certifies that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that the incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that the member should be retired; however, the board of trustees may accept a disability medical determination from the Social Security Administration in lieu of a certification from the medical board.  If a member who has been approved for a disability retirement allowance does not terminate state service within ninety (90) days after approval, the disability retirement and the application for disability retirement shall be void.  For the purposes of disability determination, the medical board shall apply the following definition of disability:  the inability to perform the usual duties of employment or the incapacity to perform such lesser duties, if any, as the employer, in its discretion, may assign without material reduction in compensation, or the incapacity to perform the duties of any employment covered by the Public Employees' Retirement System (Section 25-11-101 et seq.) that is actually offered and is within the same general territorial work area, without material reduction in compensation.  The employer shall be required to furnish the job description and duties of the member.  The employer shall further certify whether the employer has offered the member other duties and has complied with the applicable provisions of the Americans With Disabilities Act in affording reasonable accommodations that would allow the employee to continue employment. (b)  Any member applying for a disability retirement allowance must provide sufficient objective medical evidence in support of his or her claim.  All disability determinations, whether the initial examination or reexamination, shall be based on objective medical evidence.  "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs that are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that are observed and documented by medical professionals; psychiatric signs that are medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings that are anatomical, physiological, or psychological phenomena that are shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques, including, but not limited to, chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests.  Nonmedical information shall not be considered objective medical evidence. (c)  Any inactive member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, with four (4) or more years of membership service credit, or any inactive member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, with eight (8) or more years of membership service credit, who has withdrawn from active state service, is not eligible for a disability retirement allowance unless the disability occurs within six (6) months of the termination of active service and unless satisfactory proof is presented to the board of trustees that the disability was the direct cause of withdrawal from state service.  Application for a disability retirement allowance must be filed within one (1) year of termination from active service.  This period may be extended by an additional year if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that throughout the initial one-year period the member was incapable of applying for benefits by reason of mental or physical impairment as certified by a medical doctor. (d)  Any member who is or becomes eligible for service retirement benefits under Section 25-11-111 while pursuing a disability retirement allowance under this section or Section 25-11-114 may elect to receive a service retirement allowance pending a final determination on eligibility for a disability retirement allowance or withdrawal of the application for the disability retirement allowance.  In such a case, an application for a disability retirement allowance must be on file with the system before the beginning of a service retirement allowance.  If the application is approved, the option selected and beneficiary designated on the retirement application shall be used to determine the disability retirement allowance.  If the application is not approved or if the application is withdrawn, the service retirement allowance shall continue to be paid in accordance with the option selected.  No person may apply for a disability retirement allowance after the person begins to receive a service retirement allowance. (e)  If the medical board certifies that the member is not mentally or physically incapacitated for the future performance of duty, the member may request, within sixty (60) days, a hearing before the hearing officer as provided in Section 25-11-120.  All hearings shall be held in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board to govern those hearings.  The hearing may be closed upon the request of the member. (f)  The medical board may request additional medical evidence and/or other physicians to conduct an evaluation of the member's condition.  If the medical board requests additional medical evidence and the member refuses the request, the application shall be considered void. (2)  Allowance on disability retirement. (a)  Upon retirement for disability, an eligible member shall receive a retirement allowance if he has attained the age of sixty (60) years. (b)  Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), an eligible member who is retired for disability and who has not attained sixty (60) years of age shall receive a disability benefit as computed in Section 25-11-111(d), which shall consist of: (i)  A member's annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of retirement; and (ii)  An employer's annuity equal to the amount that would have been payable as a retirement allowance for eligible creditable service if the member had continued in service to the age of sixty (60) years, which shall apply to the allowance for disability retirement paid to retirees receiving such allowance upon and after April 12, 1977.  This employer's annuity shall be computed on the basis of the average "earned compensation" as defined in Section 25-11-103. (c)  For persons who become members after June 30, 1992, and for active members on June 30, 1992, who elect benefits under this paragraph (c) instead of those provided under paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the disability allowance shall consist of two (2) parts:  a temporary allowance and a deferred allowance. Except for a person whose disability resulted from work as a first responder, the temporary allowance shall equal the greater of (i) forty percent (40%) of average compensation at the time of disability, plus ten percent (10%) of average compensation for each of the first two (2) dependent children, as defined in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-11-114, or (ii) the accrued benefit based on actual service.  For a person whose disability resulted from work as a first responder, the temporary allowance shall equal the greater of (i) seventy-five percent (75%) of average compensation at the time of disability, plus ten percent (10%) of average compensation for each of the first two (2) dependent children, as defined in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-11-114, or (ii) the accrued benefit based on actual service.  It shall be payable for a period of time based on the member's age at disability, as follows: Age at Disability                      Duration 60 and earlier to age 65 61 to age 66 62 to age 66 63 to age 67 64 to age 67 65 to age 68 66 to age 68 67 to age 69 68 to age 70 69 and over                          one year The deferred allowance shall begin when the temporary allowance ends and shall be payable for life.  Except for a person whose disability resulted from work as a first responder, the deferred allowance shall equal the greater of (i) the allowance that would have been payable had the member continued in service to the termination age of the temporary allowance, but no more than forty percent (40%) of average compensation, or (ii) the accrued benefit based on actual service at the time of disability.  For a person whose disability resulted from work as a first responder, the deferred allowance shall equal the greater of (i) the allowance that would have been payable had the member continued in service to the termination age of the temporary allowance, but no more than seventy-five percent (75%) of average compensation, or (ii) the accrued benefit based on actual service at the time of disability.  The deferred allowance as determined at the time of disability shall be adjusted in accordance with Section 25-11-112 for the period during which the temporary annuity is payable.  In no case shall a member receive less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof reduced for the option selected. (d)  The member may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of the disability retirement allowance in a reduced allowance payable throughout life under any of the provisions of the options provided under Section 25-11-115. (e)  If a disability retiree who has not selected an option under Section 25-11-115 dies before being repaid in disability benefits the sum of his total contributions, then his named beneficiary shall receive the difference in cash, which shall apply to all deceased disability retirees from and after January 1, 1953. (3)  Reexamination of retirees retired on account of disability.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, once each year during the first five (5) years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every period of three (3) years thereafter, the board of trustees may, and upon his application shall, require any disability retiree who has not yet attained the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section to undergo a medical examination, the examination to be made at the place of residence of the retiree or other place mutually agreed upon by a physician or physicians designated by the board.  The board, however, in its discretion, may authorize the medical board to establish reexamination schedules appropriate to the medical condition of individual disability retirees.  If any disability retiree who has not yet attained the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section refuses to submit to any medical examination provided in this section, his allowance may be discontinued until his withdrawal of that refusal; and if his refusal continues for one (1) year, all his rights to a disability benefit shall be revoked by the board of trustees. (4)  If the medical board reports and certifies to the board of trustees, after a comparable job analysis or other similar study, that the disability retiree is engaged in, or is able to engage in, a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between his disability allowance, exclusive of cost-of-living adjustments, and the average compensation, and if the board of trustees concurs in the report, the disability benefit shall be reduced to an amount that, together with the amount earnable by him, equals the amount of his average compensation.  If his earning capacity is later changed, the amount of the benefit may be further modified, provided that the revised benefit shall not exceed the amount originally granted.  A retiree receiving a disability benefit who is restored to active service at a salary less than the average compensation shall not become a member of the retirement system. (5)  If a disability retiree under the age of sixty (60) years or the termination age of the temporary allowance under subsection (2)(c) of this section is restored to active service at a compensation not less than his average compensation, his disability benefit shall end, he shall again become a member of the retirement system, and contributions shall be withheld and reported.  Any such prior service certificate, on the basis of which his service was computed at the time of retirement, shall be restored to full force and effect.  In addition, upon his later retirement he shall be credited with all creditable service as a member, but the total retirement allowance paid to the retired member in his previous retirement shall be deducted from his retirement reserve and taken into consideration in recalculating the retirement allowance under a new option selected. (6)  If following reexamination in accordance with the provisions contained in this section, the medical board determines that a retiree retired on account of disability is physically and mentally able to return to the employment from which he is retired, the board of trustees, upon certification of those findings from the medical board, shall, after a reasonable period of time, terminate the disability allowance, whether or not the retiree is reemployed or seeks that reemployment.  In addition, if the board of trustees determines that the retiree is no longer sustaining a loss of income as established by documented evidence of the retiree's earned income, the eligibility for a disability allowance shall terminate and the allowance terminated within a reasonable period of time.  If the retirement allowance is terminated under the provisions of this section, the retiree may  later qualify for a retirement allowance under Section 25-11-111 based on actual years of service credit plus credit for the period during which a disability allowance was paid. (7)  Any current member as of June 30, 1992, who retires on a disability retirement allowance after June 30, 1992, and who has not elected to receive benefits under subsection (2)(c) of this section, shall relinquish all rights under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended, with regard to the benefits payable under this section. SECTION 7.  Section 25-11-114, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-114.  (1)  The applicable benefits provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be paid to eligible beneficiaries of any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has completed four (4) or more years of membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service, and who dies before retirement and who has not filed a Pre-Retirement Optional Retirement Form as provided in Section 25-11-111. (2)  (a)  The surviving spouse of a member who dies before retirement shall receive a monthly benefit computed in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) as if the member had nominated his spouse as beneficiary if: (i)  The member completed the requisite minimum number of years of membership service to qualify for a retirement allowance at age sixty (60), for any member who became a member of the system before March 1, 2026, or at age sixty-two (62), for any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026; (ii)  The spouse has been married to the member for not less than one (1) year preceding the death of the member; (iii)  The member has not exercised any other option. (b)  If, at the time of the member's death, there are no dependent children, and the surviving spouse, who otherwise would receive the annuity under this subsection (2), has filed with the system a signed written waiver of his or her rights to the annuity and that waiver was in effect at the time of the member's death, a lump-sum distribution of the deceased member's accumulated contributions shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117. (c)  The spouse annuity shall begin on the first day of the month following the date of the member's death, but in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year. (d)  The spouse of a member who is eligible to receive a monthly benefit under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall receive a benefit for life equal to the higher of the following: (i)  The greater of twenty percent (20%) of the deceased member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of death or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly, or, if the member died in the line of duty as a first responder, the greater of sixty-five percent (65%) of the deceased member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of death or One Hundred Sixty-five Dollars ($165.00) monthly; or (ii)  Benefits calculated under Option 2 of Section 25-11-115.  The method of calculating the retirement benefits shall be on the same basis as provided in Section 25-11-111(d), (e) or (g), as applicable.  However, if the member dies before being qualified for a full, unreduced retirement allowance, then the benefits shall be reduced by an actuarially determined percentage or factor based on the lesser of either the number of years of service credit or the number of years in age required to qualify for a full, unreduced retirement allowance in Section 25-11-111(d), (e) or (g), as applicable. (e)  The surviving spouse of a deceased member who previously received spouse retirement benefits under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection from and after July 1, 1992, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004.  From and after July 1, 2010, any spouse who chose Option 2 from and after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 2004, where the benefit, although payable for life, was less than the benefit available under the calculation in paragraph (d)(i) of this subsection shall have his or her benefit increased to the amount which provides the greater benefit. (3)  (a)  Subject to the maximum limitation provided in this paragraph, the member's dependent children each shall receive an annuity of the greater of ten percent (10%) of the member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of the death of the member or Fifty Dollars ($50.00) monthly; however, if there are more than three (3) dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to thirty percent (30%) of the member's average compensation, provided that the total annuity shall not be less than One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) per month for all children.  If the member died in the line of duty as a first responder, the member's dependent children each shall receive an annuity of the greater of twenty percent (20%) of the member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 at the time of the death of the member or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) monthly; however, if there are more than three (3) dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the member's average compensation, provided that the total annuity shall not be less than Three Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($325.00) per month for all children. (b)  A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state.  A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday.  A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned.  Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists. (c)  If there are more than three (3) dependent children, upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children. (d)  Annuities payable under this subsection (3) shall begin the first day of the month following the date of the member's death or in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year.  Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or the lawful custodian of a dependent child for the use and benefit of the child without the necessity of appointment as guardian. (4)  (a)  Death benefits in the line of duty.  Regardless of the number of years of the member's creditable service, the spouse and/or the dependent children of an active member who is killed or dies as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty shall qualify, on approval of the board, for a retirement allowance on the first of the month following the date of death, but in the case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year.  The spouse shall receive a retirement allowance for life equal to one-half (1/2) of the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103.  In addition to the retirement allowance for the spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, the member's dependent child shall receive a retirement allowance in the amount of one-fourth (1/4) of the member's average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103; however, if there are two (2) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an equal share of a total annuity equal to one-half (1/2) of the member's average compensation.  If there are more than two (2) dependent children, upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.  Those benefits shall cease to be paid for the support and maintenance of each child upon the child attaining the age of nineteen (19) years; however, the spouse shall continue to be eligible for the aforesaid retirement allowance.  Those benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or lawful custodian of the children for the use and benefit of the children without the necessity of appointment as guardian.  Any spouse who received spouse retirement benefits under this paragraph (a) from and after April 4, 1984, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this paragraph (a) by making application with the board to reinstate those benefits.  Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but not earlier than July 1, 2004. (b)  A child shall be considered to be a dependent child until marriage, or the attainment of age nineteen (19), whichever comes first; however, this age limitation shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state.  A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday.  A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned.  Any child who is physically or mentally incompetent, as adjudged by either a Mississippi court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, shall receive benefits for as long as the incompetency exists. (5)  If all the annuities provided for in this section payable on account of the death of a member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to the member's accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the annuity savings account at the time of the member's death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to the person that the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.  If there is no designated beneficiary surviving at termination of benefits, the difference shall be payable under Section 25-11-117.1(1). (6)  Regardless of the number of years of creditable service, upon the application of a member or employer, any active member who becomes disabled as a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the line of performance of duty, provided that the medical board or other designated governmental agency after a medical examination certifies that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty and the incapacity is likely to be permanent, may be retired by the board of trustees on the first of the month following the date of filing the application but in no event shall the retirement allowance begin before the termination of state service.  If a member who has been approved for a retirement allowance under this subsection does not terminate state service within ninety (90) days after the approval, the retirement allowance and the application for the allowance shall be void.  The retirement allowance shall equal the allowance on disability retirement as provided in Section 25-11-113 but shall not be less than fifty percent (50%) of average compensation.  Line of duty disability benefits under this section shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-113(1)(b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), (3), (4), (5) and (6). (7)  For purposes of determining death or disability benefits under this section, the following shall apply: (a)  Death or permanent and total disability resulting from a cardiovascular, pulmonary or musculoskeletal condition that was not a direct result of a physical injury sustained from an accident or a traumatic event caused by external violence or physical force occurring in the performance of duty shall be deemed a natural death or an ordinary disability. (b)  A mental disability based exclusively on employment duties occurring on an ongoing basis shall be deemed an ordinary disability. (8)  If the deceased or disabled member has less than four (4) years of membership service, the average compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 shall be the average of all annual earned compensation in state service for the purposes of benefits provided in this section. (9)  In case of death or total and permanent disability under subsection (4) or subsection (6) of this section and before the board shall consider any application for a retirement allowance, the employer must certify to the board that the member's death or disability was a direct result of an accident or a traumatic event occurring during and as a result of the performance of the regular and assigned duties of the employee and that the death or disability was not the result of the willful negligence of the employee. (10)  The application for the retirement allowance must be filed within one (1) year after death of an active member who is killed in the line of performance of duty or dies as a direct result of an accident occurring in the line of performance of duty or traumatic event; but the board of trustees may consider an application for disability filed after the one-year period if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that the disability is due to the accident and that the filing was not accomplished within the one-year period due to a delayed manifestation of the disability or to circumstances beyond the control of the member.  However, in case of late filing, retroactive payments will be made for a period of not more than one (1) year only. (11)  (a)  Notwithstanding any other section of this article and in lieu of any payments to a designated beneficiary for a refund of contributions under Section 25-11-117, the spouse and/or children shall be eligible for the benefits payable under this section, and the spouse may elect, for both the spouse and/or children, to receive benefits in accordance with either subsections (2) and (3) or subsection (4) of this section; otherwise, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member shall be refunded in accordance with Section 25-11-117. (b) Notwithstanding any other section of this article, a spouse who is entitled to receive a monthly benefit under either subsection (2) or (4) of this section and who is also the named beneficiary for a refund of accumulated contributions in the member's annuity savings account, may, after the death of the member, elect to receive a refund of accumulated contributions in lieu of a monthly allowance, provided that there are no dependent children entitled to benefits under subsection (3) of this section. (12)  If the member has previously received benefits from the system to which he was not entitled and has not repaid in full all amounts payable by him to the system, the annuity amounts otherwise provided by this section shall be withheld and used to effect repayment until the total of the withholdings repays in full all amounts payable by him to the system. SECTION 8.  Section 25-11-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-115.  (1)  Upon application for superannuation or disability retirement, any member may elect to receive his or her benefit in a retirement allowance payable throughout life with no further payments to anyone at the member's death, except that if the member's total retirement payments under this article do not equal the member's total contributions under this article, the named beneficiary shall receive the difference in cash at the member's death.  Or the member may elect upon retirement, or upon becoming eligible for retirement, to receive the actuarial equivalent subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section of his or her retirement allowance in a reduced retirement allowance payable throughout life with the provision that: Option 1.  If the retired member dies before he or she has received in annuity payment the value of the member's annuity savings account as it was at the time of the member's retirement, the balance shall be paid to the legal representative or to such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board; Option 2.  Upon the retired member's death, his or her reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement; Option 3.  Upon the retired member's death, one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement, and the other one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance to some other designated beneficiary; Option 4.  Upon the retired member's death, three-fourths (3/4) of his or her reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement; Option 4-A.  Upon the retired member's death, one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement; Option 4-B.  A reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of the retirant, but with the further guarantee of payments to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries for a specified number of years certain.  If the retired member or the last designated beneficiary both die before receiving all guaranteed payments due, the actuarial equivalent of the remaining payments shall be paid to the successors of the retired member under Section 25-11-117.1(1); Option 6.  Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least twenty-eight (28) years of creditable service at the time of retirement or who is at least sixty-three (63) years of age and eligible to retire, may select the maximum retirement benefit or an optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution.  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before July 1, 2011, and who has at least twenty-eight (28) years of creditable service at the time of retirement may select the maximum retirement benefit or any optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution.  Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, * * * but before March 1, 2026, and who has at least thirty-three (33) years of creditable service at the time of retirement may select the maximum retirement benefit or any optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution. * * *  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, shall not be eligible for a partial lump‑sum distribution. The amount of the lump-sum distribution under this option shall be equal to the maximum monthly benefit multiplied by twelve (12), twenty-four (24) or thirty-six (36) as selected by the member.  The maximum retirement benefit shall be actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the lump-sum distribution selected and further reduced for any other optional benefit selected.  The annuity and lump-sum distribution shall be computed to result in no actuarial loss to the system.  The lump-sum distribution shall be made as a single payment payable at the time the first monthly annuity payment is paid to the retiree.  The amount of the lump-sum distribution shall be deducted from the member's annuity savings account in computing what contributions remain at the death of the retiree and/or a beneficiary.  The lump-sum distribution option may be elected only once by a member upon initial retirement, and may not be elected by a retiree, by members applying for a disability retirement annuity, or by survivors. (2)  No change in the option selected shall be permitted after the member's death or after the member has received his or her first retirement check except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and in Section 25-11-127.  Members who are pursuing a disability retirement allowance and simultaneously or  later elect to begin to receive a service retirement allowance while continuing to pursue a disability retirement allowance, shall not be eligible to select Option 6 and that option may not be selected at a later time if the application for a disability retirement allowance is voided or denied.  However, any retired member who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A upon July 1, 1992, and whose designated beneficiary predeceased him or her or whose marriage to a spouse who is his or her designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, upon written notification to the retirement system of the death of the designated beneficiary or of the termination of the retired member's marriage to the designated beneficiary, the retirement allowance payable to the member after receipt of that notification by the retirement system shall be equal to the retirement allowance that would have been payable if the member had not elected the option.  In addition, any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, a retirement allowance under Option 1 or who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A on July 1, 1992, may elect to provide survivor benefits under Option 2 or Option 4-A to a spouse who was not previously the member's beneficiary and whom the member married before July 1, 1992. (3)  Any retired member who is receiving a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A whose designated beneficiary predeceases him or her, or whose marriage to a spouse who is his or her designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, may elect to cancel the reduced retirement allowance and receive the maximum retirement allowance for life in an amount equal to the amount that would have been payable if the member had not elected Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A.  That election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board.  Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system; however, the election may be applied retroactively for not more than three (3) months but no earlier than the first of the month following the date of the death of the beneficiary. (4)  Any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, or a retirement allowance under Option 1, and who marries after his or her retirement may elect to cancel the maximum retirement allowance and receive a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A to provide continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse.  That election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board not earlier than the date of the marriage and not later than one (1) year from the date of the marriage.  Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system. (5)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the election of an optional benefit is made after the member has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, the actuarial equivalent factor shall be used to compute the reduced retirement allowance as if the election had been made on his or her sixty-fifth birthday; however, from and after January 1, 2003, if there is an election of Option 6 after the member has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, the actuarial equivalent factor based on the retiree's age at the time of retirement shall be used to compute the reduced maximum monthly retirement allowance.  However, if a retiree marries or remarries after retirement and elects either Option 2 or Option 4-A as provided in subsection (2) or (4) of this section, the actuarial equivalent factor used to compute the reduced retirement allowance shall be the factor for the age of the retiree and his or her beneficiary at the time such election for recalculation of benefits is made. (b)  For members who retire on or after July 1, 2012, the actuarial equivalent factor used to compute the reduced retirement allowance at retirement or upon any subsequent recalculation of the benefit shall be the factor for the age of the retiree and his or her beneficiary at the time of retirement or at the time an election for recalculation of benefits is made. (6)  Notwithstanding any provision of Section 25-11-1 et seq., no payments may be made for a retirement allowance on a monthly basis for a period of time in excess of that allowed by federal law. (7)  If a retirant and his or her eligible beneficiary, if any, both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions standing to the retirant's credit in the annuity savings account at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to such persons as the retirant has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed in the office of the executive director.  If no designated person survives the retirant and his or her beneficiary, the difference, if any, shall be paid under Section 25-11-117.1(1). (8)  Any retired member who retired on Option 2(5) or 4-A(5) before July 1, 1992, who is still receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1994, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance effective July 1, 1994, equal to the amount they would have received under Option 2 or Option 4-A without a reduction for Option 5 based on the ages at retirement of the retiree and beneficiary and option factors in effect on July 1, 1992.  That increase shall be prospective only. SECTION 9.  Section 25-11-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-117.  (1)  A member may be paid a refund of the amount of accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account, provided that the member has withdrawn from state service and has not returned to state service on the date the refund of the accumulated contributions would be paid.  That refund of the contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account shall be paid within ninety (90) days from receipt in the office of the retirement system of the properly completed form requesting the payment.  In the event of death before retirement of any member whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance, the accumulated contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be paid to the designated beneficiary on file in writing in the office of the executive director of the board of trustees within ninety (90) days from receipt of a properly completed form requesting the payment.  If there is no such designated beneficiary on file for the deceased member in the office of the system, upon the filing of a proper request with the board, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be refunded under Section 25-11-117.1(1).  The payment of the refund shall discharge all obligations of the retirement system to the member on account of any creditable service rendered by the member before the receipt of the refund.  By the acceptance of the refund, the member shall waive and relinquish all accrued rights in the system. (2)  Under the Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1992 (Public Law 102-318 (UCA)), a member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary entitled to a refund under this section may elect, on a form prescribed by the board under rules and regulations established by the board, to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions payable under this section paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account.  If the member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary makes that election and specifies the eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account to which the distribution is to be paid, the distribution will be made in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the specified eligible retirement plan.  A nonspouse beneficiary may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution paid in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account established to receive the distribution on behalf of the nonspouse beneficiary.  Flexible rollovers under this subsection shall not be considered assignments under Section 25-11-129. (3)  (a)  If any person who has received a refund, reenters the state service and again becomes a member of the system before July 1, 2007, the member may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least four (4) years after the member's reentry into state service.  Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system. (b)  If any person who has received a refund, reenters the state service and again becomes a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before March 1, 2026, the member may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least eight (8) years after the member's reentry into state service.  Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made.  Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system. (c)  (i)  Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (c), if any person who has received a refund reenters state service and again becomes a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, the member shall not be eligible to repay any portion of amounts previously received as a refund and may not receive creditable service for service rendered before March 1, 2026. (ii)  If any person who has received a refund reenters state service and again becomes a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, and completes six (6) years of service as a first responder, beginning on or after March 1, 2026, such person may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment, but such repayment shall not be made for more than five (5) years of service.  Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made.  Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system. (4)  (a)  In order to provide a source of income to members who have applied for disability benefits under Section 25-11-113 or 25-11-114, the board may provide, at the employee's election, a temporary benefit to be paid from the member's accumulated contributions, if any, without forfeiting the right to pursue disability benefits, provided that the member has exhausted all personal and medical leave and has terminated his or her employment.  The board may prescribe rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions of this subsection (4). (b)  If a member who has elected to receive temporary benefits under this subsection later applies for a refund of his or her accumulated contributions, all amounts paid under this subsection shall be deducted from the accumulated contributions and the balance will be paid to the member.  If a member who has elected to receive temporary benefits under this subsection is later approved for a disability retirement allowance, and a service retirement allowance or survivor benefits are paid on the account, the board shall adjust the benefits in such a manner that no more than the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to which the member or beneficiary was or is entitled shall be paid. (c)  The board may study, develop and propose a disability benefit structure, including short- and long-term disability benefits, provided that it is the actuarial equivalent of the benefits currently provided in Section 25-11-113 or 25-11-114. SECTION 10.  Section 25-11-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-119.  (1)  The board shall keep such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system and for checking its operating experience. (2)  The board shall keep minutes which shall be open to public inspection.  It shall have the accounts of the system audited annually by the State Audit Department and shall publish as of the end of each fiscal year a report showing the fiscal transactions of the system for the preceding fiscal year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the system, a statement of income and expenditures, a statement of investments acquired and disposed of, and a balance sheet showing the financial condition of the system by means of an actuarial valuation of its assets and liabilities.  It shall also publish a synopsis of the report. (3)  The board shall establish a general office for the meeting of the board and for the administrative personnel; provide for the installation of an adequate system of books, accounts, and records which will give effect to all requirements of Articles 1 and 3; and credit all assets received by the funds according to the purposes for which they are held.  All books, accounts and records shall be kept in the general office of the board and shall be public records except for individual member records.  The system shall not disclose the name, address or contents of any individual member records without the prior written consent of the individual to whom the record pertains, except as authorized by regulations of the board. (4)  The board shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly in each year and such special meetings as may be deemed necessary. All meetings shall be open to the public. (5)  The board shall have power to make contracts, and to sue and be sued, under the name of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi. (6)  Legal advisor.  The Attorney General shall be the legal advisor of the board; and the board may employ counsel when needed. (7)  Medical board.  The board may designate a medical board to be composed of three (3) physicians or may contract with another governmental agency or nongovernmental disability determination service that is qualified to make disability determinations.  If required, other physicians may be engaged to report on special cases.  The medical board or other governmental or nongovernmental disability determination service agency so designated shall arrange for, and pass upon, all medical examinations required under the provisions of this article; shall investigate all essential statements and certificates by or on behalf of a member in connection with an application for disability retirement; and shall report in writing to the board of trustees its conclusions and recommendations upon all the matters referred to it. (8)  Duties of actuary.  The board of trustees shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical advisor of the board on matters regarding the operation of the system, and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith. (9)  At least once in each two-year period, the actuary shall make an actuarial survey of the mortality, service, withdrawal and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement system, and shall make a valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system.  Taking into account the result of such investigation and valuation, the board of trustees shall adopt for the retirement system such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary.  On the basis of such tables as the board of trustees shall adopt, the actuary shall make valuations of the assets and liabilities of the funds of the system. (10)  The board shall cause to be published online, on an annual basis, the results of the actuarial surveys to enable lawmakers and the public to monitor the fiscal health of the system. (11)  The board shall provide annual retirement planning seminars for all members of the system. SECTION 11.  Section 25-11-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-127.  (1)  (a)  No person who is being paid a retirement allowance or a pension after retirement under this article shall be employed or paid for any service by the State of Mississippi, including services as an employee, contract worker, contractual employee or independent contractor, until the retired person has been retired for not less than ninety (90) consecutive days from his or her effective date of retirement.  After the person has been retired for not less than ninety (90) consecutive days from his or her effective date of retirement or such later date as established by the board, he or she may be reemployed while being paid a retirement allowance under the terms and conditions provided in this section or in Section 25-11-126. (b)  No retiree of this retirement system who is reemployed or is reelected to office after retirement shall continue to draw retirement benefits while so reemployed, except as provided in this section or in Section 25-11-126. (c)  No person employed or elected under the exceptions provided for in this section shall become a member under Article 3 of the retirement system. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-11-126, any person who has been retired under the provisions of Article 3 and who is later reemployed in service covered by this article shall cease to receive benefits under this article and shall again become a contributing member of the retirement system.  When the person retires again, if the reemployment exceeds six (6) months, the person shall have his or her benefit recomputed, including service after again becoming a member, provided that the total retirement allowance paid to the retired member in his or her previous retirement shall be deducted from the member's retirement reserve and taken into consideration in recalculating the retirement allowance under a new option selected. (3)  The board shall have the right to prescribe rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions of this section. (4)  The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit any retiree, regardless of age, from being employed and drawing a retirement allowance either: (a)  For a period of time not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the normal working days for the position in any fiscal year during which the retiree will receive no more than one-half (1/2) of the salary in effect for the position at the time of employment, or (b)  For a period of time in any fiscal year sufficient in length to permit a retiree to earn not in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of retiree's average compensation. To determine the normal working days for a position under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the employer shall determine the required number of working days for the position on a full-time basis and the equivalent number of hours representing the full-time position.  The retiree then may work up to one-half (1/2) of the required number of working days or up to one-half (1/2) of the equivalent number of hours and receive up to one-half (1/2) of the salary for the position.  In the case of employment with multiple employers, the limitation shall equal one-half (1/2) of the number of days or hours for a single full-time position. Notice shall be given in writing to the executive director, setting forth the facts upon which the employment is being made, and the notice shall be given within five (5) days from the date of employment and also from the date of termination of the employment. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, the employer of any person who is receiving a retirement allowance and who is employed in service covered by subsection (4) of this section as an employee or a contractual employee shall pay to the board the full amount of the employer's contribution on the amount of compensation received by the retiree for his or her employment in accordance with regulations prescribed by the board.  The retiree shall not receive any additional creditable service in the retirement system as a result of the payment of the employer's contribution.  This subsection does not apply to persons who are receiving a retirement allowance and who contract with an employer to provide services as a true independent contractor, as defined by the board through regulation. (6)  (a)  A member may retire and continue in municipal or county elective office provided that the member has reached the age and/or service requirement that will not result in a prohibited in-service distribution as defined by the Internal Revenue Service, or a retiree may be elected to a municipal or county office, provided that the person: (i)  Files annually, in writing, in the office of the employer and the office of the executive director of the system before the person takes office or as soon as possible after retirement, a waiver of all salary or compensation and elects to receive in lieu of that salary or compensation a retirement allowance as provided in this section, in which event no salary or compensation shall thereafter be due or payable for those services; however, any such officer or employee may receive, in addition to the retirement allowance, office expense allowance, mileage or travel expense authorized by any statute of the State of Mississippi; or (ii)  Elects to receive compensation for that elective office in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the retiree's average compensation.  In order to receive compensation as allowed in this subparagraph, the retiree shall file annually, in writing, in the office of the employer and the office of the executive director of the system, an election to receive, in addition to a retirement allowance, compensation as allowed in this subparagraph. (b)  The municipality or county in which the retired person holds elective office shall pay to the board the amount of the employer's contributions on the full amount of the regular compensation for the elective office that the retired person holds. (c)  As used in this subsection, the term "compensation" does not include office expense allowance, mileage or travel expense authorized by a statute of the State of Mississippi. (7)  Any retired teacher who returns to work in accordance with this section shall not be eligible to return to work under the provisions of Section 25-11-126. (8)  (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the board may establish a Deferred Retirement Option Plan ("DROP") for employees who became members of the system on or after March 1, 2026.  Such a member who has attained eligibility for retirement under this article may elect to participate in the DROP in lieu of terminating employment.  Upon election, the member's monthly service retirement benefit shall be calculated and fixed as of the effective date of participation and shall not thereafter be increased by additional service or compensation. (b)  During participation in the DROP, the member shall continue in covered employment and receive full compensation, but no service credit shall accrue, and no additional employer or employee contributions shall be made on behalf of the member, except as may be required for other benefits authorized by law.  The monthly retirement benefit that would otherwise have been payable to the member shall be credited to a notional or individual DROP account established for the member, together with interest or earnings as determined by the board. (c)  Participation in the DROP shall be limited to a period not to exceed five (5) years.  Upon termination of covered employment, the member shall begin receiving the monthly retirement benefit previously fixed and shall be entitled to receive the accumulated balance of the DROP account in a manner determined by the board and consistent with applicable federal tax law.  Participation in the DROP shall not be construed as a termination of employment for any purpose under state or federal law. SECTION 12.  Section 25-11-147, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-147.  (1)  Each person becoming a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, shall have, in addition to the defined benefit plan under this article, a defined contribution plan meeting the requirements of Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. A portion of the employee's contributions shall be deposited into the employee's defined contribution account, as provided in Section 25-11-123, and the employer shall contribute an amount not less than three percent (3%) of the employee's contribution amount, and not less than five percent (5%) for an employee who is a first responder.  For an employee who has completed at least five (5) years of membership service as a first responder, the employer's minimum contribution shall be six percent (6%) of the employee's contribution amount. For an employee who has completed at least ten (10) years of membership service as a first responder, the employer's minimum contribution shall be seven percent (7%) of the employee's contribution amount.  For an employee who has completed at least fifteen (15) years of membership service as a first responder, the employer's minimum contribution shall be eight percent (8%) of the employee's contribution amount.  For every employee who has completed ten (10) years of membership service, whether as a first responder or not, the employer shall contribute a one-time amount of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) to the employee's defined contribution account.  In addition, the employer may elect to contribute an amount up to the maximum pretax amount allowable under federal law for plans under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. Members shall be vested immediately in the defined contribution plan. (2)  (a)  Pursuant to Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the board may establish a defined contribution, qualified plan under which a portion of the employee's mandatory contributions shall be deposited and which meets all requirements under federal and state law.  To the extent state law conflicts with federal law, federal law shall govern the plan document to maintain the federal tax qualified status. The board, in its fiduciary capacity, may seek approval from the Internal Revenue Service. (b)  The administration of the defined contribution plan shall be under the direction of the system. The defined contribution plan shall be operated in accordance with the guidelines established by the Internal Revenue Service for Section 401(a) plans as reflected in the plan document, as may be modified from time to time by the board of trustees, and including optional variable employer contributions and a process for hardship withdrawals by members.  Payroll reductions shall be made, in each instance, by the appropriate payroll officer.  The administrator of the defined contribution plan may contract with a private corporation or institution for providing consolidated billing and other administrative services if deemed necessary by the administrator. (c)  The board of trustees may assess the employer an amount, out of the employer's contribution rate under Section 25-11-123, up to two-tenths percent (0.2%) of the participant's total earned compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103 to provide for the administrative expenses of operating the defined contribution plan, including, but not limited to, the services of auditors, consultants, money managers and third-party administrators. (3)  Each participating member shall direct the investment of the individual's accumulated employer and employee contributions and earnings to one or more investment choices within available categories of investment provided by the board.  The board shall provide an investment menu of investment options.  In establishing the investment options, the board shall: (a)  Include predetermined investment portfolio options constructed to reflect different risk profiles that automatically reallocate and rebalance contributions as a participating member ages; and (b)  Allow a participating member to construct an investment portfolio using some or all of the investment options. SECTION 13.  Section 25-11-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-11-123.  All of the assets of the system shall be credited according to the purpose for which they are held to one (1) of four (4) reserves; namely, the annuity savings account, the annuity reserve, the employer's accumulation account, and the expense account; however, any employee who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, shall also have a defined contribution plan administered by the system, as provided in Section 25-11-147. (a)  Annuity savings account.  In the annuity savings account shall be accumulated the contributions made by members to provide for their annuities, including interest thereon which shall be posted monthly.  Credits to and charges against the annuity savings account shall be made as follows: (1)  Beginning July 1, 2010, except as otherwise provided in Section 25-11-126, the employer shall cause to be deducted from the salary of each member on each and every payroll of the employer for each and every payroll period nine percent (9%) of earned compensation as defined in Section 25-11-103; however, for any employee who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, only four percent (4%) of such earned compensation shall be deposited into the annuity savings account, with the remaining five percent (5%), to be deposited into the employee's defined contribution account authorized in Section 25-11-147. Future contributions shall be fixed biennially by the board on the basis of the liabilities of the retirement system for the various allowances and benefits as shown by actuarial valuation; however, any member earning at a rate less than Sixteen Dollars and Sixty-seven Cents ($16.67) per month, or Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per year, shall contribute not less than One Dollar ($1.00) per month, or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) per year. (2)  The deductions provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided by law for any member is reduced by the deduction.  Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall receipt for his full salary or compensation, and payment of salary or compensation less the deduction shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by the person during the period covered by the payment, except as to the benefits provided under Articles 1 and 3.  The board shall provide by rules for the methods of collection of contributions from members and the employer.  The board shall have full authority to require the production of evidence necessary to verify the correctness of amounts contributed. (b)  Annuity reserve.  The annuity reserve shall be the account representing the actuarial value of all annuities in force, and to it shall be charged all annuities and all benefits in lieu of annuities, payable as provided in this article.  If a beneficiary retired on account of disability is restored to active service with a compensation not less than his average final compensation at the time of his last retirement, the remainder of his contributions shall be transferred from the annuity reserve to the annuity savings account and credited to his individual account therein, and the balance of his annuity reserve shall be transferred to the employer's accumulation account. (c)  Employer's accumulation account.  The employer's accumulation account shall represent the accumulation of all reserves for the payment of all retirement allowances and other benefits payable from contributions made by the employer, and against this account shall be charged all retirement allowances and other benefits on account of members.  Credits to and charges against the employer's accumulation account shall be made as follows: (1)  On account of each member who became a member of the system before March 1, 2026, there shall be paid monthly into the employer's accumulation account by the employers for the preceding fiscal year an amount equal to a certain percentage of the total earned compensation, as defined in Section 25-11-103, of each member.  From and after May 9, 2024, the increase in the employer's contribution rate scheduled to take effect on July 1, 2024, is rescinded and shall not take effect; however, on July 1 of each year from 2024 through 2028, the employer's contribution rate shall be increased by one-half percent (1/2%).  For each member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, except as provided in Section 25-11-147, the employer's monthly payment under this paragraph (1) shall be applied to the accrued liability contribution fund. (2)  For the public good, any recommendation by the board to adjust the employer contributions may be accompanied by at least two (2) assessments from actuaries who are independent from each other and the retirement plan.  The actuaries shall analyze the economic impact of any such recommendation to the system and state, including, but not limited to, information showing the fiscal impact to every agency and arm of the state, including, but not limited to, state agencies, cities, counties and school districts.  The actuarial assessments, with any such recommendation to adjust the employer contributions, shall be submitted to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee and Chairman of the House Appropriations Committee. (3)  The board shall have the authority to make recommendations regarding additional funding sources for the retirement plan, including employer contribution increases, based on the assets and liabilities of the retirement plan, and the analyses required by paragraph (2) of this subsection (c).  The Legislature shall have the sole authority to implement any such recommendations.  It is the intent of the Legislature that, in the 2025 Regular Session, a law be enacted to create a new tier for future members of the system, in furtherance of the system's continued financial stability and sustainability. (4)  This section shall not be construed to provide authority to reduce or eliminate any earned benefits to be provided by the state to persons who, before July 1, 2025, are drawing a retirement allowance or are members of the system. (5)  On the basis of regular interest and of such mortality and other tables as are adopted by the board of trustees, the actuary engaged by the board to make each valuation required by this article during the period over which the accrued liability contribution is payable, immediately after making that valuation, shall determine the uniform and constant percentage of the earnable compensation of each member which, if contributed by the employer on the basis of compensation of the member throughout his entire period of membership service, would be sufficient to provide for the payment of any retirement allowance payable on his account for that service.  The percentage rate so determined shall be known as the "normal contribution rate."  After the accrued liability contribution has ceased to be payable, the normal contribution rate shall be the percentage rate of the salary of all members obtained by deducting from the total liabilities on account of membership service the amount in the employer's accumulation account, and dividing the remainder by one percent (1%) of the present value of the prospective future salaries of all members as computed on the basis of the mortality and service tables adopted by the board of trustees and regular interest.  The normal rate of contributions shall be determined by the actuary after each valuation. (6)  The total amount payable in each year to the employer's accumulation account shall not be less than the sum of the percentage rate known as the "normal contribution rate" and the "accrued liability contribution rate" of the total compensation earnable by all members during the preceding year, provided that the payment by the employer shall be sufficient, when combined with the amounts in the account, to provide the allowances and other benefits chargeable to this account during the year then current. (7)  The accrued liability contribution shall be discontinued as soon as the accumulated balance in the employer's accumulation account shall equal the present value, computed on the basis of the normal contribution rate then in force, or the prospective normal contributions to be received on account of all persons who are at that time members. (8)  All allowances and benefits in lieu thereof, with the exception of those payable on account of members who receive no prior service credit, payable from contributions of the employer, shall be paid from the employer's accumulation account. (9)  Upon the retirement of a member, an amount equal to his retirement allowance shall be transferred from the employer's accumulation account to the annuity reserve. (10)  The employer's accumulation account shall be credited with any assets authorized by law to be credited to the account. (d)  Expense account.  The expense account shall be the account to which the expenses of the administration of the system shall be charged, exclusive of amounts payable as retirement allowances and as other benefits provided herein.  The Legislature shall make annual appropriations in amounts sufficient to administer the system, which shall be credited to this account. There shall be transferred to the State Treasury from this account, not less than once per month, an amount sufficient for payment of the estimated expenses of the system for the succeeding thirty (30) days.  Any interest earned on the expense account shall accrue to the benefit of the system.  However, notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 25-11-15(10) and 25-11-105(f)(v)5, all expenses of the administration of the system shall be paid from the interest earnings, provided the interest earnings are in excess of the actuarial interest assumption as determined by the board, and provided the present cost of the administrative expense fee of two percent (2%) of the contributions reported by the political subdivisions and instrumentalities shall be reduced to one percent (1%) from and after July 1, 1983, through June 30, 1984, and shall be eliminated thereafter. (e)  Collection of contributions.  The employer shall cause to be deducted on each and every payroll of a member for each and every payroll period, beginning subsequent to January 31, 1953, the contributions payable by the member as provided in Articles 1 and 3. The employer shall make deductions from salaries of employees as provided in Articles 1 and 3 and shall transmit monthly, or at such time as the board of trustees designates, the amount specified to be deducted to the Executive Director of the Public Employees' Retirement System.  The executive director, after making a record of all those receipts, shall deposit such amounts as provided by law. (f)  (1)  The sum of the normal contribution rate and the accrued liability contribution rate shall be known as the "employer's contribution rate." (2)  The amount payable by the employer on account of normal and accrued liability contributions shall be determined by applying the employer's contribution rate to the amount of compensation earned by employees who are members of the system.  Monthly, or at such time as the board of trustees designates, each department or agency shall compute the amount of the employer's contribution payable, with respect to the salaries of its employees who are members of the system, and shall cause that amount to be paid to the board of trustees from the personal service allotment of the amount appropriated for the operation of the department or agency, or from funds otherwise available to the agency, for the payment of salaries to its employees. (3)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-11-106: (i) Constables shall pay employer and employee contributions on their net fee income as well as the employee contributions on all direct treasury or county payroll income. (ii)  The county shall be responsible for the employer contribution on all direct treasury or county payroll income of constables. (4)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-11-106.1, chancery and circuit clerks shall be responsible for both the employer and employee share of contributions on the proportionate share of net income attributable to fees, as well as the employee share of net income attributable to direct treasury or county payroll income, and the employing county shall be responsible for the employer contributions on the net income attributable to direct treasury or county payroll income. (5)  Once each year, under procedures established by the system, each employer shall submit to the Public Employees' Retirement System a copy of their report to Social Security of all employees' earnings. (6)  The board shall provide by rules for the methods of collection of contributions of employers and members.  The amounts determined due by an agency to the various funds as specified in Articles 1 and 3 are made obligations of the agency to the board and shall be paid as provided herein.  Failure to deduct those contributions shall not relieve the employee and employer from liability thereof.  Delinquent employee contributions and any accrued interest shall be the obligation of the employee and delinquent employer contributions and any accrued interest shall be the obligation of the employer.  The employer may, in its discretion, elect to pay any or all of the interest on delinquent employee contributions.  From and after July 1, 1996, under rules and regulations established by the board, all employers are authorized and shall transfer all funds due to the Public Employees' Retirement System electronically and shall transmit any wage or other reports by computerized reporting systems. SECTION 14.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.